fr: Note la plus grave écrite pour la clarinette contrebasse: Do grave; Ré grave; Mi bémol grave; Autre
it: Nota scritta più grave del clarinetto contrabbasso: Do basso; Re basso; Mi♭ basso; Altro
pt-BR: Nota mais grave escrita para clarinete contrabaixo: Dó grave; Ré grave; Mib grave; Outro
pt-PT: Nota mais grave escrita para o clarinete contrabaixo: Dó grave; Ré grave; Mib grave; Outra
ro-RO: Cea mai joasă notă scrisă pentru clarinet contrabas: Do grav; Re grav; Mib grav; Altele
el: Χαμηλότερη γραπτή νότα κόντρα-μπάσου κλαρινέτου: Χαμηλό Ντο (C); Χαμηλό Ρε (D); Χαμηλό Μι ύφεση (Eb); Άλλο
ko: 콘트라베이스 클라리넷 최저음: 로우 C; 로우 D; 로우 Eb; 기타
sl-SI: Najnižja zapisana nota kontrabas klarineta: Nizki C; Nizki D; Nizki Es; Drugo
hu: Kontra basszusklarinét legalsó leírt hangja: Alsó C; Alsó D; Alsó Eb; Egyéb
nb: Laveste nominelle note for kontrabass-klarinett: Lav C; Lav D; Lav Eb; Annet
sv: Den lägsta noten för kontrabasklarinett: Låga C; Låga D; Låga Eb; Annan
bg-BG: Най – ниската написана нота на контрабаса: Ниско до; Ниско ре; Ниско ми бемол; Друга
fi: Kontrabassoklarinetin alin mahdollinen sävel: Matala C; Matala D; Matala Eb; Muu
pl: Najniższa zapisana nuta klarnetu kontrabasowego: Niskie C; Niskie D; Niskie Eb; Inne
es: Nota escrita más baja de clarinete contrabajo: Do grave; Re grave; Mi bemol grave; Otra
ja: コントラバスクラリネット最低音: Low C; Low D; Low Eb; その他
zh-CN: 倍低音单簧管最低记谱音: 低音 C; 低音 D; 低音 Eb; 其他
th: โน้ตที่เขียนต่ำที่สุดของคลาริเน็ตคอนทราเบส: Low C; Low D; Low Eb; อื่นๆ
vi: Nốt nhạc thấp nhất viết cho kèn clarinet đại trầm: Nốt Đô (C) thấp; Nốt Rê (D) thấp; Nốt Mi giáng (Eb) thấp; Khác
de: Tiefster notierter Ton für Kontrabassklarinette: Tiefes C; Tiefes D; Tiefes Es; Sonstige
cs: Nejnižší nota v partituře pro kontrabasový klarinet: Nízké C; Nízké D; Nízké Eb; Jiné
zh-TW: 倍低音單簧管最低記譜音: 低音 C; 低音 D; 低音 Eb; 其他
ru: Самая низкая записанная нота контрабас-кларнета: Нижняя До; Нижняя Ре; Нижняя Ми-бемоль; Другое
sk-SK: Najnižšia písaná nota kontrabasového klarinetu: Nízke C; Nízke D; Nízke Eb; Iné
hr-HR: Najniža nota kontrabas klarineta: Niski C; Niski D; Niski Eb; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kontrabosinio klarneto žemiausia užrašoma nata: Žema C; Žema D; Žema Eb; Kita
da: Kontrabasklarinets laveste skrevne tone: Lavt C; Lavt D; Lavt Es; Anden
nl: Laagste genoteerde noot contrabasklarinet: Lage C; Lage D; Lage Eb; Overig
tr: Kontrbas klarnetin en düşük yazılı notası: Kalın Do; Kalın Re; Kalın Eb; Diğer
en: Contra-bass clarinet lowest written note: Low C; Low D; Low Eb; Other